test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-kealgal_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Adjective - ǩeâlǥal â-stem: # Noun 'kaulaliina' - full paradigm
     ǩeâlǥal+A+Sg+Nom: ǩeâlǥal
     ǩeâlǥal+A+Sg+Gen: ǩeâlggal
     ǩeâlǥal+A+Sg+Acc: ǩeâlggal
     ǩeâlǥal+A+Sg+Ill: ǩeâlggla
     ǩeâlǥal+A+Sg+Loc: ǩeâlgglest
     ǩeâlǥal+A+Sg+Com: ǩeâlgglin
     ǩeâlǥal+A+Ess: ǩeâlgglen
     ǩeâlǥal+A+Par: ǩeâlggled
     ǩeâlǥal+A+Sg+Abe: ǩeâlggaltää
     ǩeâlǥal+A+Pl+Nom: ǩeâlggal
     ǩeâlǥal+A+Pl+Gen: ǩeâlggli
     ǩeâlǥal+A+Pl+Acc: ǩeâlgglid
     ǩeâlǥal+A+Pl+Ill: ǩeâlgglid
     ǩeâlǥal+A+Pl+Loc: ǩeâlgglin
     ǩeâlǥal+A+Pl+Com: ǩeâlgglivuiʹm
     ǩeâlǥal+A+Pl+Abe: ǩeâlgglitää
